New York, session 2025-2026, S9344.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 138 of the public service law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, no major renewable 4 energy siting permit shall be issued for a site located in a department 5 of environmental conservation designated grassland bird conservation 6 center, including, but not limited to, three such centers in Jefferson 7 county, one center in Saint Lawrence county, the Oak-Orchard-Iroquois 8 center, the Washington County Grasslands center, the Finger Lakes 9 National Forest center and the Shawangunk Grasslands. 10 § 2. Section 139 of the public service law is amended by adding a new 11 subdivision 7 to read as follows: 12 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, no major electric 13 transmission facility siting permit shall be issued for a site located 14 in a department of environmental conservation designated grassland bird 15 conservation center, including, but not limited to, three such centers 16 in Jefferson county, one center in Saint Lawrence county, the Oak-Orch- 17 ard-Iroquois center, the Washington County Grasslands center, the Finger 18 Lakes National Forest center and the Shawangunk Grasslands. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 20 the amendments made to sections 138 and 139 of the public service law 21 made by sections one and two of this act shall not affect the repeal of 22 such sections and shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14504-01-6